New York, session 2025-2026, S8256.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision c of section 16-120 of the administrative code 2 of the city of New York is amended by adding a new paragraph 4 to read 3 as follows: 4 4. Notwithstanding any provision of this subdivision or any rule of 5 the department relating to collection to the contrary, the department 6 shall not issue a notice of violation, appearance ticket or summons to 7 any owner, lessee, tenant or occupant of a residential building or 8 dwelling, nor to a person who manages or controls such a building or 9 dwelling, for a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision e of this 10 section occurring between the hours of 3:00 p.m. on Friday and 6:00 p.m. 11 on Saturday as a result of placing refuse, solid waste or recyclable 12 material out for collection earlier than allowed under the rules of the 13 department relating to collection by the department or by a private 14 charter that is required to be licensed or registered pursuant to chap- 15 ter 1 of title 16-A of the code. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02924-03-5